New York, session 2025-2026, A6011.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Article 13 of the estates, powers and trusts law is amended 2 by adding a new part 5 to read as follows: 3 PART 5. TRANSFER ON DEATH OF FARMING IMPLEMENTS 4 § 13-5.1. Legislative intent 5 The legislature finds that in two thousand twenty-two there were 6 30,650 farms in New York state. Ninety-eight percent of those farms are 7 family owned. Farmers, by necessity, own a variety of valuable tractors 8 and other farming equipment. When a farmer dies, farm operations do not 9 stop. Operations at the farm must go on, yet any farm equipment owned by 10 the decedent at the time of death can be swept into a probate proceed- 11 ing. Farm equipment that is subject to probate may not be used until all 12 of the decedent's assets and debts have been catalogued, ownership 13 resolved, and the probate proceeding closed. Due to the uniquely intert- 14 wined nature of families and the business of farming, the legislature 15 finds that farm owners need a straightforward process to identify and 16 assign their farm equipment for continued use immediately following 17 their death, and that such process must not hamper the farmer's rights 18 to sell or encumber such equipment during the farmer's lifetime. 19 § 13-5.2. Transfer on death beneficiary; farm implements EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04764-06-6 A. 6011--A 2 1 1. Definitions. For the purposes of this section, the following terms 2 shall have the following meanings: 3 (a) "Beneficiary" means a person who receives property in a transfer 4 on death of farm implement instrument. 5 (b) "Designated beneficiary" means a person designated to receive 6 property in a transfer on death of farm implement instrument. 7 (c) "Farm implement" means a tractor or machine, including any associ- 8 ated accessories, attachments, fuel, and repair parts, used exclusively 9 and directly in farming including, but not limited to, implements of 10 husbandry, farm type tractors and all terrain type vehicles used exclu- 11 sively for agricultural or mowing purposes, or for snow plowing, other 12 than for hire, farm equipment, including self-propelled machines, 13 including caterpillar or crawler-type equipment, used exclusively in 14 growing, harvesting or handling farm produce, and timber harvesting 15 equipment such as harvesters, wood chippers, forwarders, log skidders, 16 and other processing equipment used exclusively off highway for timber 17 harvesting and logging purposes. "Farm implement" shall not include 18 personal property that is attached to, fastened to, connected to, or 19 built into real property or that becomes an addition to, component of, 20 or capital improvement to real property, and does not include buildings 21 or improvements to real property, regardless of any contribution that 22 the personal property makes to the production process of any machine and 23 regardless of the extent to which that personal property functions as a 24 machine except that the following shall be considered farm implements 25 regardless of the extent to which they are fastened to, connected to, or 26 built into real property: 27 (i) Auxiliary power generators. 28 (ii) Bale loaders. 29 (iii) Barn elevators. 30 (iv) Conveyors. 31 (v) Feed elevators and augers. 32 (vi) Grain dryers and grinders. 33 (vii) Milk coolers. 34 (viii) Milking machines, including piping, pipeline washers, and 35 compressors. 36 (ix) Silo unloaders. 37 (x) Powered feeders, but not including platforms or troughs 38 constructed from ordinary building materials. 39 (d) "Joint owner" means an individual who owns property concurrently 40 with one or more other individuals with a right of survivorship. The 41 term includes a joint tenant and owner of community property with a 42 right of survivorship. The term does not include a tenant in common or 43 owner of community property without a right of survivorship. 44 (e) "Person" means an individual, a corporation, an organization or 45 other legal entity. 46 (f) "Property" means an interest in a farm implement located in this 47 state which is transferable on the death of the owner. 48 (g) "Transfer on death of farm implement instrument" means an instru- 49 ment authorized under this section. 50 (h) "Transferor" means an individual who makes a transfer on death of 51 farm implement instrument. 52 2. Nonexclusivity. This section does not affect any method of trans- 53 ferring property otherwise permitted under the law of this state. 54 3. Transfer on death of farm implement instrument authorized. An indi- 55 vidual may transfer property to one or more beneficiaries effective at A. 6011--A 3 1 the transferor's death by a transfer on death of farm implement instru- 2 ment. 3 4. Transfer on death of farm implement instrument revocable. A trans- 4 fer on death of farm implement instrument is revocable even if the 5 instrument or another instrument contains a contrary provision. 6 5. Transfer on death of farm implement instrument nontestamentary. A 7 transfer on death of farm implement instrument is nontestamentary. 8 6. Capacity of transferor. The capacity required to make or revoke a 9 transfer on death of farm implement instrument is the same as the capac- 10 ity required to make a will. 11 7. Requirements. A transfer on death of farm implement instrument 12 shall: 13 (a) be typed or printed using letters which are legible or of clear 14 type no less than twelve point in size, or, if in writing, a reasonable 15 equivalent thereof; 16 (b) state that the transfer to the designated beneficiary is to occur 17 at the transferor's death; 18 (c) be signed by two witnesses who are present at the same time and 19 who witness the signing of the transfer on death of farm implement 20 instrument; and 21 (d) be acknowledged before a notary public. 22 8. Notice, delivery, acceptance, consideration not required. A trans- 23 fer on death of farm implement instrument shall be effective without: 24 (a) notice or delivery to or acceptance by the designated beneficiary 25 during the transferor's life; or 26 (b) consideration. 27 9. Revocation by instrument authorized; revocation by act not permit- 28 ted. (a) Subject to paragraph (b) of this subdivision, an instrument 29 shall be effective to revoke a transfer on death of farm implement 30 instrument, or any part of it, only if the instrument: 31 (i) is one of the following: 32 (1) a transfer on death of farm implement instrument that revokes the 33 instrument or part of the instrument expressly or by inconsistency; 34 (2) an instrument of revocation that expressly revokes the transfer on 35 death of farm implement instrument or part of such instrument; or 36 (3) an inter vivos instrument that expressly revokes the transfer on 37 death of farm implement instrument or part of such instrument; and 38 (ii) is acknowledged by the transferor after the acknowledgment of the 39 transfer on death of farm implement instrument which is being revoked. 40 (b) If a transfer on death of farm implement instrument is made by 41 more than one transferor: 42 (i) revocation by a transferor shall not affect the instrument as to 43 the interest of another transferor; and 44 (ii) an instrument of joint owners shall only be revoked if it is 45 revoked by all of the living joint owners. 46 (c) After a transfer on death of farm implement instrument is acknowl- 47 edged before a notary public, it shall not be revoked by a revocatory 48 act on the instrument. 49 (d) This section shall not limit the effect of an inter vivos transfer 50 of the property. 51 10. Effect of transfer on death of farm implement instrument during 52 transferor's life. During a transferor's life, a transfer on death of 53 farm implement instrument shall not: 54 (a) affect an interest or right of the transferor or any other owner, 55 including the right to transfer or encumber the property; A. 6011--A 4 1 (b) affect an interest or right of a transferee, even if the transfer- 2 ee has actual or constructive notice of the instrument; 3 (c) affect an interest or right of a secured or unsecured creditor or 4 future creditor of the transferor, even if the creditor has actual or 5 constructive notice of the instrument; 6 (d) affect the transferor's or designated beneficiary's eligibility 7 for any form of public assistance; 8 (e) create a legal or equitable interest in favor of the designated 9 beneficiary; or 10 (f) subject the property to claims or process of a creditor of the 11 designated beneficiary. 12 11. Effect of transfer on death of farm implement instrument at 13 transferor's death. (a) Except as otherwise provided in the transfer on 14 death of farm implement instrument, in this section or in any other 15 section of law which effects nonprobate transfers, on the death of the 16 transferor, the following rules apply to property that is the subject of 17 a transfer on death of farm implement instrument and owned by the 18 transferor at death: 19 (i) Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, the interest in 20 the property shall be transferred to the designated beneficiary in 21 accordance with the instrument. 22 (ii) The interest of a designated beneficiary is contingent on the 23 designated beneficiary surviving the transferor. The interest of a 24 designated beneficiary that fails to survive the transferor lapses. 25 (iii) Subject to subparagraph (iv) of this paragraph, concurrent 26 interests shall be transferred to the beneficiaries in equal and undi- 27 vided shares with no right of survivorship. 28 (iv) If the transferor has identified two or more designated benefici- 29 aries to receive concurrent interests in the property, the share of one 30 which lapses or fails for any reason shall be transferred to the other, 31 or to the others in proportion to the interest of each in the remaining 32 part of the property held concurrently. 33 (b) Subject to this chapter, a beneficiary takes the property subject 34 to all conveyances, encumbrances, assignments, contracts, mortgages, 35 liens, and other interests to which the property is subject at the 36 transferor's death. For purposes of this paragraph and this chapter, the 37 execution of the transfer on death of farm implement instrument shall be 38 deemed to have occurred at the transferor's death. 39 (c) If a transferor is a joint owner and is survived by one or more 40 other joint owners, the property that is the subject of a transfer on 41 death of farm implement instrument shall belong to the surviving joint 42 owner or owners with right of survivorship. 43 (d) If a transferor is a joint owner and is the last surviving joint 44 owner, the transfer on death of farm implement instrument shall be 45 effective. 46 (e) A transfer on death of farm implement instrument transfers proper- 47 ty without covenant or warranty of title even if the instrument contains 48 a contrary provision. 49 12. Applicability of invalidating and revocatory principles. (a) Noth- 50 ing in this section shall limit the application of principles of fraud, 51 undue influence, duress, mistake, or other invalidating cause to a 52 transfer of property. 53 (b) Divorce, annulment or declaration of nullity, or dissolution of 54 marriage, shall have the same effect on a transfer on death of farm 55 implement instrument as outlined in section 5-1.4 of this chapter. A. 6011--A 5 1 13. Renunciation. A beneficiary may renounce all or part of the bene- 2 ficiary's interest in the same manner as if the interest was transferred 3 in a will. 4 14. Liability for creditor claims and statutory allowances. (a) To the 5 extent the transferor's probate estate is insufficient to satisfy an 6 allowed claim against the estate or a statutory allowance to a surviving 7 spouse or child, the estate may enforce the liability against property 8 transferred at the transferor's death by a transfer on death of farm 9 implement instrument. 10 (b) If more than one farm implement is transferred by one or more 11 transfer on death of farm implement instruments, the liability under 12 paragraph (a) of this subdivision is apportioned among the properties in 13 proportion to their net values at the transferor's death. 14 (c) A proceeding to enforce the liability under this section shall be 15 commenced no later than eighteen months after the transferor's death. 16 15. Form of transfer on death of farm implement instrument. The 17 following form may be used to create a transfer on death of farm imple- 18 ment instrument. The other subdivisions of this section shall govern the 19 effect of this, or any other instrument used to create a transfer on 20 death of farm implement instrument: 21 (front of form) 22 REVOCABLE TRANSFER ON DEATH OF FARM IMPLEMENT INSTRUMENT 23 NOTICE TO OWNER 24 You should carefully read all information on the other side of this 25 form. You may want to consult a lawyer before using this form. 26 IDENTIFYING INFORMATION 27 Owner or Owners Making This Instrument: 28 ____________________________________________________ 29 Printed name Mailing address 30 ____________________________________________________ 31 Printed name Mailing address 32 Detailed description of the property: 33 ____________________________________________________ 34 PRIMARY BENEFICIARY 35 I designate the following beneficiary if the beneficiary survives me. 36 ____________________________________________________ 37 Printed name Mailing address, if available 38 ALTERNATE BENEFICIARY - Optional 39 If my primary beneficiary does not survive me, I designate the following 40 alternate beneficiary if that beneficiary survives me. 41 ____________________________________________________ 42 Printed name Mailing address, if available 43 TRANSFER ON DEATH 44 At my death, I transfer my interest in the described property to the 45 beneficiaries as designated above. Before my death, I have the right to 46 revoke this instrument. 47 SIGNATURE OF OWNER OR OWNERS MAKING THIS INSTRUMENT 48 ____________________________________________________ 49 Signature Date 50 ____________________________________________________ 51 Signature Date 52 SIGNATURE OF WITNESSES 53 ____________________________________________________ 54 Signature Date 55 ____________________________________________________ 56 Signature Date A. 6011--A 6 1 ____________________________________________________ 2 NOTARY ACKNOWLEDGMENT 3 (insert notary acknowledgment for instrument here) 4 (back of form) 5 COMMON QUESTIONS ABOUT THE USE OF THIS FORM 6 What does the Transfer on Death (TOD) of Farm Implement Instrument do? 7 When you die, this instrument transfers the described property, subject 8 to any liens or mortgages (or other encumbrances) on the property at 9 your death. Probate is not required. The TOD instrument has no effect 10 until you die. You can revoke it at any time. You are also free to 11 transfer the property to someone else during your lifetime. If you do 12 not own any interest in the property when you die, this instrument will 13 have no effect. 14 How do I make a TOD instrument? 15 Complete this form. Have it acknowledged before a notary public. The 16 form has no effect unless it is acknowledged before your death. 17 Can I change my mind before the TOD instrument is acknowledged before a 18 notary public? 19 Yes. If the instrument is not yet acknowledged and you want to change 20 your mind, simply tear up or otherwise destroy the instrument. 21 Can I later revoke the TOD instrument if I change my mind? 22 Yes. You can revoke the TOD instrument. No one, including the benefici- 23 aries, can prevent you from revoking the instrument. 24 How do I revoke the TOD instrument after it is acknowledged before a 25 notary public? 26 There are three ways to revoke a recorded TOD instrument: 27 (1) Complete and acknowledge a revocation form. 28 (2) Complete and acknowledge a new TOD instrument that disposes of the 29 same property. 30 (3) Transfer the property to someone else during your lifetime by a 31 sales contract or other transfer instrument that expressly revokes the 32 TOD instrument. You may not revoke the TOD instrument by will. 33 I am being pressured to complete this form. What should I do? 34 Do not complete this form under pressure. Seek help from a trusted fami- 35 ly member, friend, or lawyer. 36 Do I need to tell the beneficiaries about the TOD instrument? 37 No, but it is recommended. Secrecy can cause later complications and 38 might make it easier for others to commit fraud. 39 I have other questions about this form. What should I do? 40 This form is designed to fit some but not all situations. If you have 41 other questions, you are encouraged to consult a lawyer. 42 16. Form of revocation. The following form may be used to create an 43 instrument of revocation under this section. The other subdivisions of 44 this section shall govern the effect of this, or any other instrument 45 used to revoke a transfer on death of farm implement instrument. 46 (front of form) 47 REVOCATION OF TRANSFER ON DEATH INSTRUMENT 48 NOTICE TO OWNER 49 This revocation must be acknowledged before you die, or it will not be 50 effective. This revocation is effective only as to the interests in the 51 property of owners who sign this revocation. 52 IDENTIFYING INFORMATION 53 Owner or Owners of Property Making This Revocation: 54 ____________________________________________________ 55 Printed name Mailing address 56 ____________________________________________________ A. 6011--A 7 1 Printed name Mailing address 2 Detailed description of the property: 3 ____________________________________________________ 4 REVOCATION 5 I revoke all my previous transfers of this property by transfer on 6 death instrument. 7 SIGNATURE OF OWNER OR OWNERS MAKING THIS REVOCATION 8 ____________________________________________________ 9 Signature Date 10 ____________________________________________________ 11 Signature Date 12 SIGNATURE OF WITNESSES 13 ____________________________________________________ 14 Signature Date 15 ____________________________________________________ 16 Signature Date 17 NOTARY ACKNOWLEDGMENT 18 (insert notary acknowledgment here) 19 (back of form) 20 COMMON QUESTIONS ABOUT THE USE OF THIS FORM 21 How do I use this form to revoke a Transfer on Death (TOD) of farm 22 implement instrument? 23 Complete this form. Have it acknowledged before a notary public. The 24 form must be acknowledged before your death, or it has no effect. 25 I am being pressured to complete this form. What should I do? 26 Do not complete this form under pressure. Seek help from a trusted fami- 27 ly member, friend, or lawyer. 28 I have other questions about this form. What should I do? 29 This form is designed to fit some but not all situations. If you have 30 other questions, consult a lawyer. 31 § 2. Subparagraph 5 of paragraph (f) of section 5-1.4 of the estates, 32 powers and trusts law, as added by chapter 173 of the laws of 2008, is 33 amended to read as follows: 34 (5) "Governing instrument" includes, but is not limited to, a will, 35 testamentary instrument, trust agreement (including, but not limited to 36 a totten trust account under 7-5.1(d)), insurance policy, thrift, 37 savings, retirement, pension, deferred compensation, death benefit, 38 stock bonus or profit-sharing plan, account, arrangement, system or 39 trust, agreement with a bank, brokerage firm or investment company, 40 registration of securities in beneficiary form pursuant to part 4 of 41 article 13 of this chapter, a transfer on death of farm implement 42 instrument, a court order, or a contract relating to the division of 43 property made between the divorced individuals before or after the 44 marriage, divorce, or annulment. 45 § 3. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 46 ing the date on which it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, 47 the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation neces- 48 sary for the implementation of this act on its effective date are 49 authorized to be made and completed on or before such effective date.